Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-175
Committed person; treatment; duties.

Whenever the Director of Correctional Services finds that a person committed to the department requires specialized treatment, or treatment of a kind that is not feasible to provide within the department, the director may place such person in institutions providing such treatment in another jurisdiction and may agree to pay reimbursement therefor. A person so transferred to an out-of-state institution shall be subject to the rules and regulations of such institution concerning the custody, conduct, and discipline of its inmates but shall remain subject to the Nebraska Treatment and Corrections Act concerning his or her term, reduction of term, and release on parole.

Laws 1969, c. 817, § 6, p. 3075;

Laws 1997, LB 396, § 24.